Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,114
Court-ordered indemnification and
advance for expenses.

(MBCA
8.54) (a) A director who is a party to a proceeding because he or she is a
director may apply for indemnification or an advance for expenses to the court
conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. After
receipt of an application and after giving any notice it considers necessary,
the court shall:

(1) Order indemnification
if the court determines that the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification
under section 21-2,112;

(2)
Order indemnification or advance for expenses if the court determines that
the director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses pursuant
to a provision authorized by subsection (a) of section 21-2,118; or

(3) Order indemnification
or advance for expenses if the court determines, in view of all the relevant
circumstances, that it is fair and reasonable:

(i) To indemnify the director; or

(ii) To advance expenses
to the director, even if he or she has not met the relevant standard of conduct
set forth in subsection (a) of section 21-2,111, failed to comply with section
21-2,113, or was adjudged liable in a proceeding referred to in subdivision
(d)(1) or (2) of section 21-2,111, but if the director was adjudged so liable
indemnification shall be limited to expenses incurred in connection with the
proceeding.

(b)
If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section or to indemnification or advance for expenses
under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, it shall also order the corporation
to pay the director's expenses incurred in connection with obtaining court-ordered
indemnification or advance for expenses. If the court determines that the
director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses under subdivision
(a)(3) of this section, it may also order the corporation to pay the director's
expenses to obtain court-ordered indemnification or advance for expenses.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 114.
January 1, 2017